Washington statutes.
RCW 26.04.130

Voidable marriages.

When either party to a marriage shall be incapable of consenting thereto, for want of a sufficient understanding, or when the consent of either party shall be obtained by force or fraud, such marriage is voidable, but only at the suit of the party laboring under the disability, or upon whom the force or fraud is imposed.

[ 2024 c 10 s 2; Code 1881 s 2381; 1866 p 81 s 3; RRS s 8449.]

NOTES:

Application—2024 c 10: See note following RCW 26.04.010.